Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.566

Agency record for review—Costs.

(1) Within thirty days after service of the petition for judicial review, or within further time allowed by the court or by other provision of law, the agency shall transmit to the court the original or a certified copy of the agency record for judicial review of the agency action. The record shall consist of any agency documents expressing the agency action, other documents identified by the agency as having been considered by it before its action and used as a basis for its action, and any other material described in this chapter as the agency record for the type of agency action at issue, subject to the provisions of this section.

(2) If part of the record has been preserved without a transcript, the agency shall prepare a transcript for inclusion in the record transmitted to the court, except for portions that the parties stipulate to omit in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.

(3) The agency may charge a nonindigent petitioner with the reasonable costs of preparing any necessary copies and transcripts for transmittal to the court. A failure by the petitioner to pay any of this cost to the agency relieves the agency from the responsibility for preparation of the record and transmittal to the court.

(4) The record may be shortened, summarized, or organized temporarily or, by stipulation of all parties, permanently.

(5) The court may tax the cost of preparing transcripts and copies of the record:

(a) Against a party who unreasonably refuses to stipulate to shorten, summarize, or organize the record; or

(b) In accordance with any provision of law.

(6) Additions to the record pursuant to RCW 34.05.562 must be made as ordered by the court.

(7) The court may require or permit subsequent corrections or additions to the record.

[ 1989 c 175 s 26; 1988 c 288 s 515.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.